Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-237
Judge or clerk of election; inspector; failure to appear; replacement procedure.

If any judge or clerk of election or inspector fails to appear at the appropriate hour, the inspector or remaining judges and clerks shall notify the county clerk, select a registered voter to serve in place of the absent person, and proceed to conduct the election. The registered voter shall be affiliated with the same political party as the absent person if possible.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 57;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 7.